Utah statutes.
58-44a-402.   Authority to assess penalty.

(1)  After a proceeding pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, and Title 58, Chapter 1, Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing Act, the division may impose an administrative penalty of up to $10,000 for unprofessional or unlawful conduct under this chapter in accordance with a fine schedule established by rule.

(2)  The assessment of a penalty under this section does not affect any other action the division is authorized to take regarding a license issued under this chapter.

(3)  The division may impose an administrative penalty of up to $500 for any violation of Subsection 58-44a-501(2), (3), or (4), consistent with Section 58-44a-503.

